West Virginia, session 2025, HB2449.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1A. SEARCH AND SEIZURE. §62-1A-12. Open fields. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, the open fields of any person in this state, where indicia would lead a reasonable person to conclude that the area is private or not generally open to the public are protected by the Fourth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States or Article III, Section 6 of the West Virginia Constitution and may not be searched without a valid search warrant or outside the judicial process, subject only to constitutionally established exceptions permitting warrantless searches of private property. (b) For purposes of this section, "open fields" means the private property of a person beyond the land immediately surrounding and associated with a private dwelling and includes fenced land and wooded areas. (c) The open fields doctrine, as it is known in the common law, is hereby abolished.